Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,188
Board; duties.

The board shall hold hearings and advise the State Fire Marshal on rules and regulations for methods of testing equipment and construction and installation of new boilers required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act and for inspection and certificate fees for such boilers.

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-743;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 24.